Colorado statutes. TITLE 3 United States
ARTICLE 1
PROPERTY CEDED TO UNITED STATES

Section

3-1-101. Consent to acquisition of lands by United States.

The consent of this state is hereby given to the purchase by the United States of such ground in the city of Denver, or any other city or incorporated town in this state, as its authorities may select, for the accommodation of the United States circuit and district courts, post offices, land offices, mints, or other government offices in said cities or incorporated towns, and also to the purchase by the United States of such other lands within this state as its authorities may from time to time select for the erection of forts, magazines, arsenals, and other needful buildings.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 167, § 1.

G.S.

omitted.

R.S. 08:

§ 6899.

C.L.

§ 492.

CSA:

C. 168, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-1.

3-1-102. Consent to acquire land - when notice required - directive to the attorney general.

Except as provided in this section, the consent of the state of Colorado is hereby given, in accordance with section 8 (17) of article I of the constitution of the United States, to the acquisition by the United States, by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, of any land in the state required for custom houses, courthouses, post offices, arsenals, or other buildings whatever, or for any other proper purpose of the United States government; except that consent is not hereby given to the acquisition of, or exclusive jurisdiction over, land sought by the United States department of defense for purposes associated with the expansion of the Piñon Canyon maneuver site. However, before any privately owned land in the state is acquired for any purpose other than for public highways, custom houses, courthouses, post offices, arsenals, or other governmental buildings, the United States shall give written notice of intention to acquire the land to the board of county commissioners of the county wherein the land is situated and to the division of property taxation, which notice shall be given at least sixty days prior to the date of the intended acquisition. If the notice is not given or if the board of county commissioners or the division files with the secretary of state of the state of Colorado within the sixty-day period a request that the acquisition be considered by the general assembly of the state of Colorado, then the consent of the state of Colorado shall not be deemed to have been given to the acquisition unless and until the general assembly of the state of Colorado shall have by law specifically consented thereto.

The attorney general of the state of Colorado shall oppose any attempt by the United States department of defense or other unit of federal government to acquire by any means, including purchase or condemnation, state lands for which consent to acquire has been withdrawn pursuant to this section for the expansion of the Piñon Canyon maneuver site pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and section 36-1-123.5, C.R.S. Such opposition shall be made a priority by the attorney general and, whenever feasible, take precedence over any other matters.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 589, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6900.

C.L.

§ 493.

CSA:

C. 168, § 2.

L. 47:

p. 895, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-2.

L. 63:

p. 977, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-2.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 681, § 2, effective May 3.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1317), ch. 381, p. 2072, § 1, effective June 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 183, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

3-1-103. Jurisdiction of United States over land.

Exclusive jurisdiction in and over any land so acquired by the United States shall be and the same is hereby ceded to the United States for all purposes, except the service of all civil and criminal process of the courts of this state; but the jurisdiction so ceded shall continue no longer than the said United States shall own such land.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 589, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6901.

C.L.

§ 494.

CSA:

C. 168, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-3.

3-1-104. When jurisdiction vests - tax exemption.

The jurisdiction ceded shall not vest until the United States shall have acquired the title to the said lands by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise; and so long as the said lands shall remain the property of the said United States when acquired and no longer, the same shall be and continue exempt and exonerated from all state, county, and municipal taxation, assessment, or other charges which may be levied or imposed under the authority of this state.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 589, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 6902.

C.L.

§ 495.

CSA:

C. 168, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-4.

3-1-105. Jurisdiction over Denver public building site ceded.

Exclusive jurisdiction for all purposes, except such as are in this section and section 3-1-107 expressly reserved, over all that tract, piece, or parcel of land situate, lying, and being in the city and county of Denver, in the state of Colorado, known and distinguished as and being lots numbered one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, in block ninety-eight, in the east division of the city and county of Denver, bounded on the northwest by Arapahoe street, on the northeast by Sixteenth street, on the southeast by an alley running from Fifteenth street to Sixteenth street, between Arapahoe and Curtis streets, and on the southwest by the line dividing said lot eight from lot nine in said block, be and hereby is ceded, granted, transferred, conferred, and confirmed unto the United States of America, as a proper site for the erection thereon of a suitable building for the accommodation of the United States district and circuit courts and other government offices, in the manner and form in this section and section 3-1-107 prescribed, from and after the time when the United States shall become the owner of said tract, and for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof; but, nevertheless, jurisdiction to serve the civil process of state, county, and municipal courts and tribunals within said tract, and also to serve and execute thereon, process in criminal cases by state, county, and municipal officers, in respect of offenses, misdemeanors, crimes, and felonies committed outside of said tract is reserved to the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 205, § 1.

G.S.

omitted.

R.S. 08:

§ 6903.

C.L.

§ 496.

CSA:

C. 168, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-5.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 908, § 1, effective August 6.

3-1-106. Governor to execute deed.

When the governor of this state shall be advised by the attorney general of the United States or the attorney of the United States for the district of Colorado, that a valid title to the said land for the site of such building has vested in the United States, the said governor shall make, execute, and deliver to the United States of America, a deed, sealed with the great seal of the state of Colorado, and attested by the secretary of state thereof, whose duty it shall be to attest the same, containing apt, meet, and proper words, clauses, and covenants to fully cede, give, grant, transfer, confer, and confirm such jurisdiction unto the United States of America; but nevertheless therein reserving to this state, jurisdiction for the purposes mentioned in section 3-1-105; and at, from, and after the making, executing, ensealing, attesting, and delivery of such deed, such exclusive jurisdiction shall vest and remain in the United States of America for and during all the time that the United States shall remain the owner of said tract, subject only to the right and jurisdiction for the service and execution of process in sections 3-1-105 to 3-1-107 expressly reserved to this state.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 206, § 2.

G.S.

omitted.

R.S. 08:

§ 6904.

C.L.

§ 497.

CSA:

C. 168, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-6.

3-1-107. Exempt from taxation.

From and after the delivery of such deed of cession, the said site and the erections, structures, buildings, fixtures, goods, chattels, and property at any time thereon, or thereto belonging, or in any wise appertaining and belonging to the United States, shall be and remain released and exempt from all tollages, taxes, and assessments of every name and nature for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 206, § 3.

G.S.

omitted.

R.S. 08:

§ 6905.

C.L.

§ 498.

CSA:

C. 168, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-7.

3-1-108. Jurisdiction over Pueblo post office ceded.

Whenever any officer or officers of the United States thereunto duly authorized shall designate or select a tract of sufficient area within the corporate limits of the city of Pueblo as and for the site of a public building, and the title thereto shall have been conveyed and confirmed to the United States of America by the owner or owners thereof, the governor of this state shall make, execute, and deliver to the United States of America a deed, sealed with the great seal of the state of Colorado and attested by the secretary of state, containing apt, meet, and proper words, clauses, and covenants to fully cede, give, grant, transfer, confer, and confirm exclusive jurisdiction for all purposes whatsoever over such tract of land, and all and every part thereof, unto the United States of America; but nevertheless therein reserving to this state jurisdiction to serve the civil process of state, county, and municipal courts and tribunals within said tract of land, to serve and execute therein processes in criminal cases by state, county, and municipal officers in respect to offenses, misdemeanors, crimes, and felonious acts committed outside of said tract, and at, from, and after the making, executing, ensealing, attesting, and delivery of such deed, exclusive jurisdiction shall vest in and remain in the United States of America for and during all the time the United States shall remain the owner of said tract, subject only to the state jurisdiction for the service of execution and process reserved to this state over said tract of land so ceded, granted, transferred, confirmed, and conferred unto the United States of America for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 48, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6906.

C.L.

§ 499.

CSA:

C. 168, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-8.

3-1-109. Exempt from taxation.

From and after delivery of such deed of cession, the said site and tract of land, and the erections, structures, buildings, fixtures, goods, chattels, and property at any time thereon or thereto belonging, or in any wise appertaining and belonging to the United States, shall be and remain released and exempt from all tollages, taxes, and assessments of every name and nature, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 49, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6907.

C.L.

§ 500.

CSA:

C. 168, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-9.

3-1-110. Jurisdiction over Leadville post office ceded.

Whenever any officer or officers of the United States thereunto duly authorized, shall designate or select a tract of sufficient area within the corporate limits of the city of Leadville as and for the site of a public building, and the title thereto shall have been conveyed and confirmed to the United States of America by the owner or owners thereof, the governor of this state shall make, execute, and deliver to the United States of America a deed, sealed with the great seal of the state of Colorado and attested by the secretary of state, containing apt, meet, and proper words, clauses, and covenants to fully cede, give, grant, transfer, confer, and confirm exclusive jurisdiction for all purposes whatsoever over such tract of land, and all and every part thereof, unto the United States of America; but, nevertheless, therein reserving to this state, jurisdiction to serve the civil process of state, county, and municipal courts and tribunals within said tract of land, to serve and execute therein processes in criminal cases by state, county, and municipal officers in respect to offenses, misdemeanors, crimes, and felonious acts committed outside of said tract, and at, from, and after the making, executing, ensealing, attesting, and delivery of such deed, exclusive jurisdiction shall vest in and remain in the United States of America for and during all the time the United States shall remain the owner of said tract, subject only to the state jurisdiction for the service of execution and process reserved to this state over said tract of land so ceded, granted, transferred, confirmed, and conferred unto the United States of America for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 57, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6908.

C.L.

§ 501.

CSA:

C. 168, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-10.

3-1-111. Exempt from taxation.

From and after delivery of such deed of cession, the said site and tract of land, and the erections, structures, buildings, fixtures, goods, chattels, and property at any time thereon or thereto belonging, or in any wise appertaining and belonging to the United States, shall be and remain released and exempt from all tollages, taxes, and assessments of every name and nature, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 58, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6909.

C.L.

§ 502.

CSA:

C. 168, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-11.

3-1-112. Jurisdiction over Colorado Springs post office ceded.

Whenever any officer or officers of the United States thereunto duly authorized, shall designate or select a tract of land of sufficient area within the corporate limits of the city of Colorado Springs, in the state of Colorado, as and for the site of a public building of the United States, and the title to the said tract of land shall have been conveyed and confirmed to the United States of America by the owner or owners thereof, the governor of this state, when he shall be advised by the attorney general of the United States, or the attorney of the United States for the district of Colorado, that a valid title to the said land is vested in the United States, shall make, execute, and deliver to the United States of America a deed, sealed with the great seal of the state of Colorado and attested by the secretary of state of this state, whose duty it shall be to attest the same, containing apt, meet, and proper words, clauses, and covenants to fully cede, give, grant, transfer, confer, and confirm exclusive jurisdiction for all purposes whatsoever over such tract of land, and all and every part thereof, unto the United States of America; the United States of America shall remain the owner of said tract of land, subject only to the state jurisdiction for the service of execution and process reserved to this state over said tract of land so ceded, granted, transferred, confirmed, and conferred unto the United States of America for and during the time the United States of America shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 398, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6910.

C.L.

§ 503.

CSA:

C. 168, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-12.

3-1-113. Exempt from taxation.

From and after the delivery of such deed of cession, the said site and tract of land, and the erections, structures, buildings, fixtures, goods, chattels, and property at any time thereon or thereto belonging, or in any wise appertaining and belonging to the United States of America, shall be and remain released and exempt from all tollages, taxes, and assessments of every name, nature, character, and description, for and during the time the United States of America shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 399, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6911.

C.L.

§ 504.

CSA:

C. 168, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-13.

3-1-114. Jurisdiction over Denver mint site ceded.

Whenever any officer or officers of the United States thereunto duly authorized, shall designate or select a tract of land within the corporate limits of the city of Denver as and for the site of a public building for a United States mint, and the title thereto shall have been conveyed and confirmed to the United States of America by the owner or owners thereof, the governor of this state shall make, execute, and deliver to the United States of America a deed, sealed with the great seal of the state of Colorado, and attested by the secretary of state, containing apt, meet, and proper words, clauses, and covenants to fully cede, give, grant, transfer, confer, and confirm exclusive jurisdiction for all purposes whatsoever over such tract of land, and all and every part thereof unto the United States of America; but, nevertheless, therein reserving to the state of Colorado jurisdiction to serve the civil process of state, county, and municipal courts and tribunals within said tract of land, to serve and execute therein processes in criminal cases by state, county, and municipal officers in respect to offenses, misdemeanors, crimes, and felonious acts committed outside of said tract, and at, from, and after the making, executing, ensealing, attesting, and delivery of such deed, exclusive jurisdiction shall vest in and remain in the United States of America for and during all the time the United States shall remain the owner of said tract of land, subject only to the state jurisdiction for the service of execution and process reserved to this state over said tract of land so ceded, granted, transferred, confirmed, and conferred unto the United States of America for and during the time the United States of America shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1895:

p. 216, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6912.

C.L.

§ 505.

CSA:

C. 168, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-14.

3-1-115. Exempt from taxation.

From and after delivery of such deed of cession, the said site and tract of land, and the erections, structures, buildings, fixtures, goods, chattels, and property at any time thereon or thereto belonging, or in any wise appertaining and belonging to the United States, shall be and remain released and exempt from all tollages, taxes, and assessments of every name and nature, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1895:

p. 217, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6913.

C.L.

§ 506.

CSA:

C. 168, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-15.

3-1-116. Jurisdiction of Fort Lewis ceded.

The exclusive jurisdiction for all purposes, except such as are in sections 3-1-116 to 3-1-118 expressly reserved, over and all that tract, piece or parcel of land known as Fort Lewis, in the state of Colorado, known and described as follows, to wit: Beginning at a post marked "O.M.U.S.M.R.", on the northern boundary of the Southern Ute Indian reservation, due south nine thousand two hundred and sixty-nine feet from the southwest corner of section thirty-five, township thirty-five north, of range eleven west, of the New Mexican principal meridian; thence south eighty-eight degrees, twenty minutes west along said Ute line four miles; thence due north five miles; thence due east five miles; thence due north one mile; thence due east five miles; thence due south five miles, three thousand seven hundred and sixty-six feet to said Ute line; thence south eighty-eight degrees, twenty-five minutes west along said Ute line, three miles; thence south eighty-eight degrees twenty minutes west along said Ute line, three miles, to the place of beginning, excepting therefrom all sections, and parts of same, and all lands and parts of same, now filed or entered, the titles to which have been, or may be perfected by the present claimants, their heirs and assigns, all bearings from the true meridian, be and hereby is ceded, granted, transferred, conferred, and confirmed unto the United States of America, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof; but, nevertheless, jurisdiction to serve the civil process of state, county, and municipal courts and tribunals, within said tract, and also to serve and execute thereon process in criminal cases, by state, county, and municipal officers, in respect of offenses, misdemeanors, crimes, and felonies committed outside of said tract, is reserved to the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 270, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6914.

C.L.

§ 507.

CSA:

C. 168, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-16.

Cross references:

For establishment of Fort Lewis college on this property, see part 1 of article 52 of title 23.

3-1-117. Governor to execute deed.

The governor of this state shall make, execute, and deliver to the United States of America, a deed, sealed with the great seal of the state of Colorado, and attested by the secretary of state thereof, whose duty it shall be to attest the same, containing apt, meet, and proper words, clauses, and covenants to fully cede, give, grant, transfer, confer, and confirm such jurisdiction unto the United States of America, but nevertheless therein reserving to this state jurisdiction for the purposes mentioned in the last preceding section; and at, from, and after the making, executing, ensealing, attesting, and delivery of such deed, such exclusive jurisdiction shall vest and remain in the United States of America, for and during all the time that the United States shall remain the owner of said tract, subject only to the right and jurisdiction for the service and execution of process in sections 3-1-116 to 3-1-118 expressly reserved to this state.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 271, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6915.

C.L.

§ 508.

CSA:

C. 168, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-17.

3-1-118. Exempt from taxation.

From and after the delivery of such deed of cession, the said site, and the erections, structures, buildings, fixtures, goods, chattels, and property at any time thereon, or thereto belonging, or in any wise appertaining and belonging to the United States, shall be and remain released and exempt from all tollages, taxes, and assessments, of every name and nature, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 271, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 6916.

C.L.

§ 509.

CSA:

C. 168, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-18.

3-1-119. Jurisdiction of Fort Logan ceded.

Whenever any officer or officers of the United States, thereunto duly authorized, shall designate or select a tract of six hundred and forty acres of land at or near the city of Denver, in the state of Colorado, as and for the site of a military post, and the title thereto shall have been conveyed and confirmed to the United States of America by the owner or owners thereof, the governor of this state shall make, execute, and deliver to the United States of America a deed, sealed with the great seal of the state of Colorado, and attested by the secretary of state, containing apt, meet, and proper words, clauses, and covenants to fully cede, give, grant, transfer, confer, and confirm exclusive jurisdiction for all purposes whatsoever, over such tract of land, and all and every part thereof, unto the United States of America; but nevertheless, therein reserving to this state jurisdiction to serve the civil process of state, county, and municipal courts and tribunals within said tract of lands; to serve and execute therein processes in criminal cases by state, county, and municipal officers in respect to offenses, misdemeanors, crimes, and felonious acts committed outside of said tract, and at, from and after the making, executing, ensealing, attesting, and delivery of such deed, exclusive jurisdiction shall vest in and remain in the United States of America, for and during all the time the United States shall remain the owner of said tract, subject only to the state jurisdiction for the service of execution and process reserved to this state over said tract of land so ceded, granted, transferred, confirmed, and conferred unto the United States of America, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 339, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6920.

C.L.

§ 513.

CSA:

C. 168, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-22.

Cross references:

For acquisition of portions of this property by the state for the mental health institute at Fort Logan, see § 25-1-117; for establishment of the mental health institute at Fort Logan, see article 94 of title 27.

3-1-120. Exempt from taxation.

From and after delivery of such deed of cession, the said site and tract of land, and the erections, structures, buildings, fixtures, goods, chattels, and property at any time thereon or thereto belonging, or in any wise appertaining and belonging to the United States, shall be and remain released and exempt from all tollages, taxes, and assessments, of every name and nature, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 340, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6921.

C.L.

§ 514.

CSA:

C. 168, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-23.

3-1-121. Jurisdiction of land for enlargement of Fort Logan ceded.

The consent of the state of Colorado is hereby given to the purchase by the United States, for the enlargement of the military reservation of Fort Logan in the county of Arapahoe in this state, of the west half of the northeast quarter of the southwest quarter of section five and north half of section seven, all in township five south, range sixty-eight west, of the sixth principal meridian, containing about three hundred and forty acres; and exclusive jurisdiction is ceded thereover for all purposes whatsoever; and the consent of the state of Colorado is further given to the purchase by the United States, for the purpose of a target range for Fort Logan, Colorado, of the east half of section twenty and all of section twenty-nine, township six south, range sixty-six west, of the sixth principal meridian in the county of Douglas in this state, containing an area of about nine hundred and sixty acres; and exclusive jurisdiction is ceded thereover for all purposes whatsoever; but the consent and cessions herein given are subject to the reservation by the state of jurisdiction to serve the civil process of state, county, and municipal courts and tribunals within said lands; and to serve and execute thereon process in criminal cases by the state, county, and municipal officers in respect to offenses, misdemeanors, crimes, and felonious acts committed outside of said tract.

Source:

L. 09:

p. 440, § 1.

C.L.

§ 515.

CSA:

C. 168, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-24.

3-1-122. Jurisdiction of Uncompahgre cantonment ceded.

Exclusive jurisdiction for all except such as are in sections 3-1-122 to 3-1-124 expressly reserved, over all that tract, piece, or parcel of land known as the cantonment on the Uncompahgre river, in the state of Colorado, known and described as follows: Beginning at the flagstaff on said cantonment, and running thence north sixty-one degrees, four minutes east eighty-six chains, to a point on the eastern boundary; thence north thirty-three degrees west three hundred and twenty-five and thirty-one one-hundredths chains, to the north corner; thence south fifty-seven degrees west and one hundred and seventy-six and sixty-four hundredths chains, to the west corner; thence south thirty-three degrees east four hundred and sixty-nine and fifty hundredths chains to the south corner; thence north fifty-seven degrees east one hundred and seventy-six and sixty-four hundredths chains, to the east corner; thence west one hundred and forty-four and nineteen hundredths chains, to the first mentioned point on the boundary, completing the rectangle, and containing an area of about twelve and ninety-six one-hundredths square miles, or eight thousand two hundred and ninety-three and twenty-five one-hundredths acres. The bearings are true, variation of the needle, December, 1880, fourteen degrees forty-five minutes east; be, and hereby is, ceded, granted, transferred, conferred, and confirmed unto the United States of America, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof; but, nevertheless, jurisdiction to serve the civil process of state, county, and municipal courts and tribunals, within said tract, and also to serve and execute thereon process in criminal cases by state, county, and municipal officers, in respect of offenses, misdemeanors, crimes, and felonies committed outside of the said tract, is reserved to the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 272, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6922.

C.L.

§ 516.

CSA:

C. 168, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-25.

3-1-123. Governor to execute deed.

The governor of this state shall make, execute, and deliver to the United States of America, a deed, sealed with the great seal of the state of Colorado, and attested by the secretary of state thereof, whose duty it shall be to attest the same, containing apt, meet, and proper words, clauses, and covenants, to fully cede, give, grant, transfer, confer, and confirm such jurisdiction unto the United States of America; but, nevertheless, therein reserving to this state jurisdiction for the purposes mentioned in the last preceding section; and at, from, and after the making, executing, ensealing, attesting, and delivery of such deed, such exclusive jurisdiction shall vest and remain in the United States of America for and during all the time that the United States shall remain the owner of said tract, subject only to the right and jurisdiction for the service and execution of process in sections 3-1-122 to 3-1-124 expressly reserved to this state.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 273, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6923.

C.L.

§ 517.

CSA:

C. 168, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-26.

3-1-124. Exempt from taxation.

From and after the delivery of such deed of cession, the said site and erections, structures, buildings, fixtures, goods, chattels, and property, at any time thereon or thereto belonging or in any wise appertaining and belonging to the United States, shall be and remain released and exempt from all tollages, taxes, and assessments, of every name and nature, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 273, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 6924.

C.L.

§ 518.

CSA:

C. 168, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-27.

3-1-125. Jurisdiction over land for Indian school ceded.

Exclusive jurisdiction, for all purposes except such as are in sections 3-1-125 to 3-1-127 expressly reserved over all that tract, piece or parcel of land, situated near Grand Junction, in the county of Mesa, in the state of Colorado, known and described as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of the southwest quarter section eighteen, township one, south of range one, east of the Ute meridian; thence running east along the south line of said section eighteen, seventy rods; thence north eighty rods, more or less, to the north line of the southwest quarter of the southeast quarter of said section eighteen; thence west seventy rods, to the east line of the southwest quarter of said section eighteen; thence south eighty rods, more or less, to the place of beginning; being the west thirty-five acres of south half of the southeast quarter of section eighteen, township one, south of range one, east of the Ute meridian, and adjoining the lands of the United States used for an Indian school, and as an addition thereto, for like use, be and hereby is ceded, granted, transferred, conferred, and confirmed unto the United States of America, from and after the time when the United States shall become the owner of said tract, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof; but, nevertheless, jurisdiction to serve the civil process of state, county, and municipal courts and tribunals, within said tract, and also to serve and execute thereon process in criminal cases, by state, county, and municipal officials, in respect of offenses, misdemeanors, crimes, and felonies, committed outside of said tract, is reserved to the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 55, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6925.

C.L.

§ 519.

CSA:

C. 168, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-28.

3-1-126. Governor to execute deed.

When the governor of this state shall be advised by the attorney general of the United States, or the attorney of the United States for the district of Colorado, that a valid title to the said land is vested in the United States, the said governor shall make, execute, and deliver to the United States of America a deed sealed with the great seal of the state of Colorado, and attested by the secretary of state thereof, whose duty it shall be to attest the same, containing apt, meet, and proper words, clauses, and covenants to fully cede, give, grant, transfer, confer, and confirm such jurisdiction unto the United States of America; but, nevertheless, therein reserving to the state of Colorado jurisdiction for the purposes mentioned in the last preceding section, and at, from, and after the making, executing, ensealing, attesting, and delivering of said deed, such exclusive jurisdiction shall vest and remain in the United States of America for and during all the time that the United States shall remain the owner of said tract, subject only to the right and jurisdiction for the service and execution of process in sections 3-1-125 to 3-1-127 expressly reserved to the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 56, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6926.

C.L.

§ 520.

CSA:

C. 168, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-29.

3-1-127. Exemption from taxation.

From and after the delivery of such deed of cession, the said tract and all erections, structures, buildings, fixtures, goods, chattels, and property, at any time thereon or thereto belonging or in any wise appertaining and belonging to the United States, shall be and remain exempt from tollages, taxes, and assessments of every name and nature, for and during the time the United States shall remain the owner thereof.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 57, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 6927.

C.L.

§ 521.

CSA:

C. 168, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-30.

3-1-128. State canal number three released.

The state of Colorado hereby releases and relinquishes to the United States of America all of its right, title, and interest in and to state canal number three and all rights and privileges acquired in connection therewith, and the board of control of said state canal number three is hereby directed, upon the acceptance of the United States government, through such lawful means as said government shall determine, of the benefits of this section and the next succeeding section, and by its taking over the said canal, to release, relinquish, and convey to the said United States government, or to such body or board as may be created by the congress of the United States to take over and complete said canal, all right, title, claim, and interest of the state of Colorado and of said board of control of state canal number three in and to the said canal and tunnel, and all rights, privileges, and authority in connection therewith, and to any and all things necessary and proper to fully and completely turn over to the United States government, or to any body or board so created by it, the property, rights, and privileges herein referred to, such release, relinquishment, and conveyance to be made without cost to the United States government; all to the end that the United States government may have full and complete authority to construct, maintain, operate, and dispose of said canal and any and all water and rights in connection therewith.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 292, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6928.

C.L.

§ 522.

CSA:

C. 168, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-31.

3-1-129. Board to report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 03:

p. 292, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6929.

C.L.

§ 523.

CSA:

C. 168, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 142-1-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-1-32.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 554, § 1, effective April 24.